Utah statutes.
32B-4-411.   Minor's unlawful use of proof of age.

(1)  As used in this section, "proof of age violation" means a violation by a minor of:

(a)  Chapter 1, Part 4, Proof of Age Act; or

(b)  if as part of the violation the minor uses a proof of age in violation of Chapter 1, Part 4, Proof of Age Act:

(i)  Section 32B-4-409; or

(ii)  Section 32B-4-410.

(2)  If a court finds a minor engaged in a proof of age violation, notwithstanding the penalties provided for in Subsection (1):

(a) (i)  for a first violation, the minor is guilty of a class B misdemeanor;

(ii)  for a second violation, the minor is guilty of a class A misdemeanor; and

(iii)  for a third or subsequent violation, the minor is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except that the court may impose:

(A)  a fine of up to $5,000;

(B)  screening, assessment, or substance abuse treatment, as defined in Section 41-6a-501;

(C)  an educational series, as defined in Section 41-6a-501;

(D)  alcoholic product related community service or compensatory service work program hours;

(E)  fees for restitution and treatment costs;

(F)  defensive driver education courses; or

(G)  a combination of these penalties; and

(b) (i)  for a minor who is at least 13 years old, but younger than 18 years old:

(A)  the court shall forward to the Driver License Division a record of an adjudication under Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996, for a violation under this section; and

(B)  the provisions regarding suspension of a driver license under Section 78A-6-606 apply; and

(ii)  for a minor who is at least 18 years old, but younger than 21 years old:

(A)  the court shall forward to the Driver License Division a record of conviction for a violation under this section; and

(B)  the Driver License Division shall suspend the person's license under Section 53-3-220.

(3)  When the Department of Public Safety receives the arrest or conviction record of an individual for a driving offense committed while the individual's license is suspended pursuant to this section, the Department of Public Safety shall extend the suspension for an additional like period of time.

(4)  A court may not fail to enter a judgment of conviction under this section under a plea in abeyance agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

